GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-regions.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     region names and demonyms
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!#
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj
+Demonym

+Region

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Abbr +Acron

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space
[h]	! add h for masculine plural 

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)

LEXICON ROOT 

!# regions of Italy

Abruzzo^]+Prop+Region			MSGPL;
Alto% Adige+Prop+Region			MSG;
Basilicata+Prop+Region			FSG;
Calabria+Prop+Region			FSG;
Campania+Prop+Region			FSG;
Campidano+Prop+Region			MSG;
Cinque% terre+Prop+Region		FPL;
Emilia% Romagna+Prop+Region		FSG;
Emilia+Prop+Region			FSG;
Friuli+Prop+Region			MSG;
Friuli[-]Venezia% Giulia+Prop+Region	MSG;
Gallura+Prop+Region			FSG;
Garfagnana+Prop+Region			FSG;
Gargano+Prop+Region			MSG;
Insubria+Prop+Region			FSG;
Irpinia+Prop+Region			FSG;
Lazio+Prop+Region			MSG;
Liguria+Prop+Region			FSG;
Logudoro+Prop+Region			MSG;
Lombardia+Prop+Region			FSG;
Lucania+Prop+Region			FSG;
Lunigiana+Prop+Region			FSG;
Marche+Prop+Region			FPL;
Maremma+Prop+Region			FSG;
Molise+Prop+Region			MSG;
Padania+Prop+Region			FSG;
Piemonte+Prop+Region			MSG;
Puglia^]+Prop+Region			FSGPL;
Romagna+Prop+Region			FSG;
Salento+Prop+Region			MSG;
Sardegna+Prop+Region			FSG;
Sicilia+Prop+Region			FSG;
Sulcis+Prop+Region			MSG;
Toscana+Prop+Region			FSG;
Trentino+Prop+Region			MSG;
Trentino-Alto% Adige+Prop+Region	MSG;
Trexenta+Prop+Region			FSG;
Umbria+Prop+Region			FSG;
Valle% d'Aosta+Prop+Region		FSG;
Veneto+Prop+Region			MSG;
Venezia% Giulia+Prop+Region		FSG;





!# regional NADJs

abruzzese+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
altoatesino+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
calabrese+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
campano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
campidanese+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
emiliano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
romagnolo+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
fiulano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
giuliano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
gallurese+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
garfagnano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
garganico+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;	!pl:-ci
insubre+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
irpino+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
laziale+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
ligure+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
logudorese+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
lombardo+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
lucano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
lunigiano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
marchigiano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
maremmano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
molisano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
padano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
piemontese+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
pugliese+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
sardo+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
salentino+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
siciliano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
siculo+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
sulcitano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
toscano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
trentino+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
trexentino+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
umbro+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
valdostano+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;
veneto+NAdj+Demonym+Region		MFSGPL;




Cisgiordania+Prop+Region		FSG;
Palestina+Prop+Region		FSG;







Asturie+Prop+Region		FPL;
Barbagie+Prop+Region		FPL;
Egadi+Prop+Region		FPL;
Eolie+Prop+Region		FPL;
Fiandre+Prop+Region		FPL;
Langhe+Prop+Region		FPL;
Lipari+Prop+Region		FPL;
Pampas+Prop+Region		FPL;
Pelagie+Prop+Region		FPL;
Tremiti+Prop+Region		FPL;
Alsazia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Alvernia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Amazzonia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Anatolia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Andalusia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Andorra+Prop+Region		FSG;
Appia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Aquitania+Prop+Region		FSG;
Aragona+Prop+Region		FSG;
Aurelia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Barbage+Prop+Region		FSG;
Barbagia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Baviera+Prop+Region		FSG;
Boemia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Bretagna+Prop+Region		FSG;
Brianza+Prop+Region		FSG;
Caledonia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Capitanata+Prop+Region		FSG;
Capri+Prop+Region		FSG;
Carnia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Castiglia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Catalogna+Prop+Region		FSG;
Cernaia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Cilento+Prop+Region		FSG;
Ciociaria+Prop+Region		FSG;
Columbia% Britannica+Prop+Region		FSG;
Copacabana+Prop+Region		FSG;
Cornovaglia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Creta+Prop+Region		FSG;
Crimea+Prop+Region		FSG;
Dalmazia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Daunia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Elba+Prop+Region		FSG;
Engadina+Prop+Region		FSG;
Enotria+Prop+Region		FSG;
Erzegovina+Prop+Region		FSG;
Estremadura+Prop+Region		FSG;
Flaminia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Franciacorta+Prop+Region	FSG;
Frigia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Frignano+Prop+Region		FSG;
Frisia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Galizia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Giava+Prop+Region		FSG;
Gibilterra+Prop+Region		FSG;
Giudecca+Prop+Region		FSG;
Grenada+Prop+Region		FSG;
Grenadine+Prop+Region		FSG;
Guascogna+Prop+Region		FSG;
Iglesiente+Prop+Region		FSG;
Illiria+Prop+Region		FSG;
Indocina+Prop+Region		FSG;
Ionia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Irpinia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Ischia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Istria+Prop+Region		FSG;
Itaca+Prop+Region		FSG;
Lampedusa+Prop+Region		FSG;
Lidia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Linguadoca+Prop+Region		FSG;
Livinallongo+Prop+Region	FSG;
Locride+Prop+Region		FSG;
Lomellina+Prop+Region		FSG;
Lorena+Prop+Region		FSG;
Magna% Grecia+Prop+Region	FSG;
Maremma+Prop+Region		FSG;
Martinica+Prop+Region		FSG;
Masuria+Prop+Region		FSG;
Medio% Oriente+Prop+Region	FSG;
Murcia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Nomentana+Prop+Region		FSG;
Normandia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Nubia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Nuova% Scozia+Prop+Region	FSG;
Nurra+Prop+Region		FSG;
Ogliastra+Prop+Region		FSG;
Ossola+Prop+Region		FSG;
Pampa+Prop+Region		FSG;
Pantelleria+Prop+Region		FSG;
Papua+Prop+Region		FSG;
Patagonia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Pianura% Padana+Prop+Region	FSG;
Piccardia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Planargia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Pomerania+Prop+Region		FSG;
Provenza+Prop+Region		FSG;
Puglia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Rebibbia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Sabina+Prop+Region		FSG;
Salaria+Prop+Region		FSG;
Sannio+Prop+Region		FSG;
Sassonia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Savoia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Scandinavia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Siberia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Sila+Prop+Region		FSG;
Stromboli+Prop+Region		FSG;
Sumatra+Prop+Region		FSG;
Svevia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Tasmania+Prop+Region		FSG;
Terra% di% Lavoro+Prop+Region	FSG;
Tracia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Traiana+Prop+Region		FSG;
Transilvania+Prop+Region	FSG;
Valtellina+Prop+Region		FSG;
Versilia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Zelanda+Prop+Region		FSG;
Campi% Flegrei+Prop+Region	MPL;
Campi% Raudii+Prop+Region	MPL;
Caraibi+Prop+Region		MPL;
Grigioni+Prop+Region		MPL;
Agro% Pontino+Prop+Region	MSG;
Alberta+Prop+Region		MSG;
Alcatraz+Prop+Region		MSG;
Andhra% Pradesh+Prop+Region	MSG;
Argentario+Prop+Region		MSG;
Baden+Prop+Region		MSG;
Baden-Württenberg+Prop+Region	MSG;
Belice+Prop+Region		MSG;
Bengala+Prop+Region		MSG;
Biafra+Prop+Region		MSG;
Bihar+Prop+Region		MSG;
Borneo+Prop+Region		MSG;
Brandeburgo+Prop+Region		MSG;
Brennero+Prop+Region		MSG;
Cadore+Prop+Region		MSG;
Canavese+Prop+Region		MSG;
Carso+Prop+Region		MSG;
Casentino+Prop+Region		MSG;
Castelgandolfo+Prop+Region	MSG;
Caucaso+Prop+Region		MSG;
Cervino+Prop+Region		MSG;
Chianti+Prop+Region		MSG;
Circeo+Prop+Region		MSG;
Colosseo+Prop+Region		MSG;
Cremlino+Prop+Region		MSG;
Dakota+Prop+Region		MSG;
Deccan+Prop+Region		MSG;
Delfinato+Prop+Region		MSG;
Ellesponto+Prop+Region		MSG;
Escoriale+Prop+Region		MSG;
Essex+Prop+Region		MSG;
Etna+Prop+Region		MSG;
Golan+Prop+Region		MSG;
Gujarat+Prop+Region		MSG;
Indostan+Prop+Region		MSG;
Kashmir+Prop+Region		MSG;
Kent+Prop+Region		MSG;
Kerala+Prop+Region		MSG;
Labrador+Prop+Region		MSG;
Lario+Prop+Region		MSG;
Leon+Prop+Region		MSG;
Madhia% Pradesh+Prop+Region	MSG;
Maghreb+Prop+Region		MSG;
Maharashtra+Prop+Region		MSG;
Manitoba+Prop+Region		MSG;
Medio-Oriente+Prop+Region	MSG;
Mirafiori+Prop+Region		MSG;
Monferrato+Prop+Region		MSG;
Montecitorio+Prop+Region	MSG;
Mugello+Prop+Region		MSG;
New% Brunswick+Prop+Region	MSG;
Ontario+Prop+Region		MSG;
P.% Chigi+Prop+Region		MSG;
Pellice+Prop+Region		MSG;
Peloponneso+Prop+Region		MSG;
Poggioreale+Prop+Region		MSG;
Polesine+Prop+Region		MSG;
Pollino+Prop+Region		MSG;
Posillipo+Prop+Region		MSG;
Prado+Prop+Region		MSG;
Punjab+Prop+Region		MSG;
Quebec+Prop+Region		MSG;
Queensland+Prop+Region		MSG;
Rajastan+Prop+Region		MSG;
Sahara+Prop+Region		MSG;
Sahel+Prop+Region		MSG;
Sarcidano+Prop+Region		MSG;
Saskatchewan+Prop+Region	MSG;
Sussex+Prop+Region		MSG;
Tamil% Nadu+Prop+Region		MSG;
Tavoliere+Prop+Region		MSG;
Tibet+Prop+Region		MSG;
Uttar% Pradesh+Prop+Region	MSG;
Vallese+Prop+Region		MSG;
Victoria+Prop+Region		MSG;
Viminale+Prop+Region		MSG;
Volturno+Prop+Region		MSG;
Vomero+Prop+Region		MSG;
Yukon+Prop+Region		MSG;
Macau+Prop+Region		XSG;
Monaco+Prop+Region		XSG;
Singapore+Prop+Region		XSG;



!# ========================================================================
!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	XSG	+MF+Sg		#;

LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;	! invariant
